Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Chapter 5

Inquests

38-5-101. Affidavit required to hold inquest.

No inquest shall be held by the coroner or any court of general sessions over the dead body of any person until an affidavit, in writing, is made and signed by two (2) or more reliable persons, averring the death of the person and that there is good reason to believe that the person died by unlawful violence at the hands of some other person; and without the affidavit, in writing, the coroner or court shall have no jurisdiction to hold an inquest over the dead body of any person, and all proceedings without the affidavit shall be utterly void and useless. Unless this section is literally, rigidly, and strictly complied with, and the affidavit filed with the papers, the coroner or court shall receive no fees or compensation for holding the inquest.

Acts 1895, ch. 31, § 1; Shan., § 7274; Code 1932, § 11876; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-401.

Cross-References. Autopsies performed on application of district attorney, § 38-1-104.

Coroners, title 8, ch. 9.

Health authorities and recipients of dead bodies to be notified of communicable diseases or AIDS, § 68-5-102.

Mining accidents, inquests, § 59-4-303.

Post-mortem examination act, title 38, ch. 7.

38-5-102. False affidavit — Perjury.

Any person who falsely, willfully, and corruptly swears out an affidavit as provided for in § 38-5-101 shall be deemed guilty of perjury, and punished as provided for by law for the offense, and in addition to the penalty provided by law for perjury, shall be taxed with all the costs incidental to the inquisition, based upon the false and corrupt affidavit.

Acts 1895, ch. 31, § 2; Shan., § 7275; Code 1932, § 11877; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-402.

Compiler's Notes. The penalty provisions in this section may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-110, 40-35-111.

Cross-References. Perjury, title 39, ch. 16, part 7.

38-5-103. Courts of general sessions may hold inquests as coroners.

Courts of general sessions shall have the same power, when called on, to hold juries of inquest over the bodies of deceased persons, as coroners, and have the same fees as are allowed coroners for the same services.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 112, § 1; Shan., § 7277; Code 1932, § 11878; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-403.

Cross-References. Coroners, title 8, ch. 9.

Courts of general sessions, title 16, ch. 15.

38-5-104. Jury.

The jury of inquest shall consist of seven (7) jurors who shall be summoned by the coroner and be sworn by such coroner to inquire who the person was, and when, where and by what means that person died, and to render a true verdict on the death, according to the evidence offered the jurors or arising from inspection of the body.

Code 1858, § 5300; Shan., § 7278; Code 1932, § 11879; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 11879; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-404.

Cross-References. Coroners, title 8, ch. 9.

38-5-105. Subpoenas for witnesses.

The coroner may issue subpoenas for witnesses, returnable immediately, or at the time and place as the coroner may appoint, and may enforce witnesses' attendance and punish for contempt and other causes, in like manner as a court of general sessions in a state case.

Code 1858, § 5301; Shan., § 7279; Code 1932, § 11880; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-405.

Cross-References. Coroners, title 8, ch. 9.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 23.10.

38-5-106. Who shall be summoned as witnesses.

The coroner shall summon and examine as a witness every person who, in the coroner's opinion, or that of any of the coroner's jury, has any knowledge of the facts.

Code 1858, § 5302; Shan., § 7280; Code 1932, § 11881; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-406.

Cross-References. Coroners, title 8, ch. 9.

38-5-107. Surgeon or physician as witness.

The coroner may also summon as a witness a surgeon or physician, when requested so to do by the district attorney general, to make examination of the body, including the performing of an autopsy, and give a professional opinion as to the cause of death, whose fee shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00), and the fee shall be allowed in the bill of costs.

Code 1858, § 5303 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 75, § 2); Shan., § 7281; Code 1932, § 11882; Acts 1943, ch. 26, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 11882; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-407.

Cross-References. Authority of district attorney general to act as criminal investigator, § 8-6-408.

Coroners, title 8, ch. 9.

Prosecution for district attorney general, § 3-3-121.

Law Reviews.

Dead Bodies — Unprivileged Autopsy, 19 Tenn. L. Rev. 369 (1946).

38-5-108. Employment of chemist.

The coroner may also, whenever deemed necessary, employ a competent chemist to examine for poison, and make an analysis of suspected substances, whose fee, not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00), shall be allowed in the bill of costs.

Code 1858, § 5304 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 75, § 4); Shan., § 7282; Code 1932, § 11883; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-408.

Cross-References. Coroners, title 8, ch. 9.

38-5-109. Allowances to physicians and chemists limited.

No allowance shall be made under § 38-5-107 or § 38-5-108, except to persons actually summoned by the coroner for the express purpose, and duly reported by the coroner to the court.

Code 1858, § 5305 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 75, § 3); Shan., § 7283; Code 1932, § 11884; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-409.

Cross-References. Coroners, title 8, ch. 9.

38-5-110. Service of process.

The summons for the jurors and the subpoenas for witnesses may be served by the sheriff, or any constable of the county, or by the coroner personally.

Code 1858, § 5306; Shan., § 7284; Code 1932, § 11885; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-410.

38-5-111. Verdict of jury.

The jury, after inspecting the body, hearing the testimony, and making all needful inquiries, shall render a verdict by an inquisition in writing, signed by the jury, setting forth as near as may be, who the person was, when, where, and by what means the person died, and whether by the act of another, and what other person, and whether by unlawful means.

Code 1858, § 5307; Shan., § 7285; Code 1932, § 11886; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-411.

38-5-112. Form of inquisition.

The inquisition shall be as follows:

State of Tennessee,

County.

An inquisition held at , in the county and state aforementioned, on the day of , 20 , before , coroner of such county, upon the body of (or a person unknown), there lying dead, by the jurors whose names are hereto subscribed, who upon their oaths do say: (here state, when, how, by what person, means, weapon, or accident the person died, and whether feloniously, as near as may be according to the requirements of § 38-5-111).

In testimony whereof, the jurors have hereunto set their hands the day and date above.

Code 1858, § 5308; Shan., § 7286; Code 1932, § 11887; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-412.

38-5-113. Return of inquisition.

The coroner shall immediately return the inquisition to the criminal court of the coroner's county, if any, and, if not, to the circuit court of the county, together with a list of the witnesses who testified to material facts.

Code 1858, § 5309; Shan., § 7287; Code 1932, § 11888; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-413.

Cross-References. Coroners, title 8, ch. 9.

38-5-114. Witnesses may be bound over.

The coroner shall also require all material witnesses to enter into an undertaking to appear at such court, if in session, or at the next succeeding term, and may require security for such undertaking, and, for this purpose, the coroner is vested with all the powers of a court of general sessions in state cases.

Code 1858, § 5310; Shan., § 7288; Code 1932, § 11889; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-414.

Cross-References. Coroners, title 8, ch. 9.

Courts of general sessions, title 16, ch. 15.

38-5-115. Arrest of person if present.

If the jury finds that the deceased died by the act of another by unlawful means, the coroner may arrest the person implicated, if present, and may make out a warrant requiring an officer, or other person authorized by the officer, to take such person before a magistrate, or may commit the person until the person can be carried before a magistrate.

Code 1858, § 5311; Shan., § 7289; Code 1932, § 11890; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-415.

Cross-References. Arrest warrants, title 40, ch. 6, part 2.

Coroners, title 8, ch. 9.

Magistrates, title 40, ch. 5.

Officials prohibited from issuing warrants, § 40-5-106.

Uniform general sessions court warrant, § 16-15-5012.

38-5-116. Warrant for arrest if person not present.

If the person charged is not present, the coroner may issue a warrant to the sheriff, or any other lawful officer, requiring the officer to arrest such person and take the person before a magistrate.

Code 1858, § 5312; Shan., § 7290; Code 1932, § 11891; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-416.

Cross-References. Arrest warrants, title 40, ch. 6, part 2.

Coroners title 8, ch. 9.

Magistrates, title 40, ch. 5.

Officials prohibited from issuing warrants, § 40-5-106.

Uniform general sessions court warrant, § 16-15-5012.

38-5-117. Effect of coroner's warrant.

The warrant of a coroner in the cases covered by this chapter shall be of equal authority with that of a court of general sessions, and, when the person charged is brought before the court, the person shall be dealt with as a person held under complaint in the usual form.

Code 1858, § 5313; Shan., § 7291; Code 1932, § 11892; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-417.

Cross-References. Coroners, title 8, ch. 9.

38-5-118. Disposition of body of decedent.

After the inquisition, the coroner or medical investigator may deliver the body of the deceased to the deceased's relatives, if there are any; but if not, the coroner or the medical investigator shall cause the deceased to be decently buried or cremated in accordance with § 68-4-113, and the expense to be paid from the property found with the body, or, if there is none, from the county treasury, by certifying an account of the expenses to the county mayor, who shall allow and pay the expenses, if deemed reasonable, as other claims on the county.

Code 1858, § 5314; Shan., § 7292; Code 1932, § 11893; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-418, Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2013, ch. 287, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2 provided that the chief executive officer of each county shall be redesignated and hereafter referred to as the county mayor, effective July 1, 2003.

Cross-References. Coroners, title 8, ch. 9.

Attorney General Opinions. No state law or constitutional provision requires a local government to provide a burial, cremation, or other funeral services for indigent individuals. State law requires only that each county cover the expenses, when necessary, for the burial or cremation of unclaimed bodies by the coroner or medical examiner. OAG 18-13, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (3/20/2018).

38-5-119. Disposition of effects found on body.

The coroner shall, within forty (40) days after an inquest on a dead body, deliver to the county trustee any money or other property found on the body, unless used for burial, or claimed in the meantime by the legal representatives of the deceased. If the coroner fails so to do, the trustee may, by motion before any tribunal having cognizance of the amount, upon ten (10) days' notice to the coroner, recover from the coroner and the coroner's official sureties the amount or value of the money or property, with interest, and twelve and one half percent (12.5%) damages.

Code 1858, § 5315; Shan., § 7293; Code 1932, § 11894; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-419.

Cross-References. Coroners, title 8, ch. 9.

38-5-120. Duty of county trustee as to effects found on body.

Upon receipt of the money by the trustee as provided in § 38-5-119, the trustee shall place it to the credit of the county. If it is other property, the trustee shall, within three (3) months, sell it at the courthouse of the county, at public auction, upon reasonable public notice, and shall, in like manner, place the proceeds to the credit of the county.

Code 1858, § 5316; Shan., § 7294; Code 1932, § 11895; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-420.

38-5-121. Delivery of property or payment of money to legal representatives of deceased.

If the property, before sale, or the money in the treasury, is demanded in six (6) years by the legal representatives of the deceased, the trustee shall deliver or pay it to them, after deducting the fees of the coroner, expenses of sale, and three percent (3%) commissions for the trustee, and the money may be paid to the representative at any time after the expiration of six (6) years, upon the order of the court of general sessions.

Code 1858, § 5317; Shan., § 7295; Code 1932, § 11896; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-421.